Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1 Public Utilities Commission
39-1-18.
Hearings and records — Certified copies.

All hearings and orders of the commission and of the division, and the records thereof, shall be public and any person shall be permitted to record all or any portion of a hearing by way of camera, video, or tape recorder of any kind, unless a party to the hearing requests, and the chairperson or administrator grants the request, that the recording be prohibited for the protection of attorney-client privilege, confidentiality, or other interest of the parties. All reports, records, files, books, and accounts in the possession of the commission or the division shall be open to inspection by the public at all reasonable times. The division may charge and collect reasonable fees for copies of official documents, orders, papers, and records, and for authenticating or certifying the same; provided that no fee shall be charged for single copies of official documents, orders, papers, and records, furnished to public officers of the state for use in their official capacity, or for the annual reports in the ordinary course of distribution.

All filings made to the division or commission shall also be provided digitally in a manner established by the division. The commission and division may adopt rules exempting filings from this requirement.

In order to support the ability of the public and interested parties to stay informed of the activities of the commission and the division, and to promote awareness of utility restructuring, the division shall maintain a site on the internet through which the public may access:

Notices of and agendas of hearings;

All filings that are available in digital format and that are not subject to protective orders;

All orders, rules, and regulations of the commission or administrator;

Announcements of, agendas for, and minutes of open meetings;

A calendar of all forthcoming open meetings and hearings;

Current tariffs of all public utilities subject to assessment pursuant to §

39-1-23

; provided, however, that the division may require any public utility with extensive tariffs to maintain a website and provide access to those tariffs via a link from the division’s website;

A listing of all public utilities and nonregulated power producers, together with consumer contact information for each;

Consumer information on billing dispute resolution, retail access, conservation, and consumer-assistance programs;

Demand-side management programs available to residential, commercial, and industrial customers; and

Other information as the division deems relevant and useful to the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 9; P.L. 1929, ch. 1394, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-7

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-18

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 9.

39-1-19.
Personnel — Legal representation.

To carry out the purposes of this title, the commission and the division, within the appropriation therefor, are authorized to employ such clerks, stenographers, engineers, accountants, and agents as may be required, who shall be in the classified service, and may also retain and employ experts, consultants, and assistants on a contract or other basis for rendering legal, financial, professional, technical, or other assistance or advice.

When requested by the administrator, the attorney general, or an assistant designated by him or her, shall appear and represent the division in any hearing, investigation, action, or proceeding under this title, or in reference to any act or proceeding of the division, and intervene in any action or proceeding in which is involved any question arising under this title. In all cases in which the attorney general or an assistant intervenes on behalf of the state as a customer of a public utility, or on behalf of the citizens of the state, as customers of a public utility, the division may employ legal counsel to represent it, as provided for in §

39-1-20

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, §§ 10, 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, §§ 10, 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1956, §§

39-1-10

,

39-1-11

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-19

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 277, § 1.

39-1-20.
Assistance for investigations and hearings.

Whenever the commission or the division shall conduct an investigation or hearing upon a proposal by a public utility to increase its rates, tolls, or charges, or to issue stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, or to merge or consolidate with another company, it may employ legal counsel, official stenographers, and expert witnesses, and may designate disinterested persons free from bias, prejudice, and pecuniary interest in the matter concerned, to examine into and testify regarding the matters involved and all collateral issues at all hearings and in any appeal procedures until final determination in law has been had.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1.

39-1-21.
Access to premises of utility.

The commissioners, the attorney general, and the agents of the division, as provided in §§

39-1-15

and

39-1-20

, while engaged in the performance of their duties, may, at all reasonable times, enter any premises, buildings, cars, plant, or equipment, or other places belonging to, or controlled by, any public utility, communications carrier, or contract carrier, and inspect the same or any part thereof, and any person obstructing, hindering, or in any way causing to be obstructed or hindered, any commissioner or the attorney general or any agent of the division, in the performance of his or her duties, or who shall refuse to permit any commissioner, the attorney general, or any agent of the division entrance into any premises, building, cars, plant, or equipment, or other places belonging to or controlled by any public utility, communications carrier, or contract carrier, in the performance of his or her duties as such, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-13

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-21

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-22.
False returns.

A company subject to the supervision of the commission or division that furnishes it with a sworn or affirmed report, return, or statement, that the company knows or should know contains false figures or information regarding any material matter lawfully required of it, and any company that fails within a reasonable time to obey a final order of the commission or division, shall be fined not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1.

39-1-23.
Administrative expenses — Assessment against utilities.

The administrator shall aggregate the expenses of the division, including expenses incurred by the attorney general pursuant to §

39-1-19

and expenses incurred by the commission, for each upcoming fiscal year and shall apportion and assess these expenses among the state’s regulated utilities based upon approved budgets. When submitting the budget, the budget office shall clearly indicate the revenues from assessments. Included within this prospective assessment, shall be those expenses expected to be incurred by the attorney general pursuant to §

39-1-19

for the upcoming fiscal year. The expenses anticipated by the attorney general and the commission for each upcoming fiscal year shall be communicated to the administrator within thirty (30) days of request by the administrator. The administrator shall thereupon apportion and assess one hundred percent (100%) of such expenses among the several public utility companies and common carriers located in this state in the proportion that the gross intrastate-utility-operating revenues of each public utility company and common carrier shall bear to the total, gross intrastate-utility-operating revenues for the last preceding fiscal year of all public utility companies and common carriers; provided, however, that any public utility or common carrier, whose gross intrastate revenues in any fiscal year as reported to the administrator do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), shall not be subject to the assessment under the provisions hereof; and, provided further, that all motor carriers subject to the provisions of chapters 12 and 14 of this title shall not be subject to the assessment under the provisions hereof. The sum so apportioned and assessed shall be in addition to any taxes payable to the state under any other provision of law. The assessments shall be divided between the commission and the division based upon the approved budgets.

The administrator shall apply any budgetary balance or shortfalls remaining from a prior, annual assessment toward the next upcoming fiscal-year assessment to the division or the commission as appropriate.

Upon collection from the several public utility companies and common carriers operating in this state, assessments and any state appropriations shall be deposited in an account to be known as the public utilities commission funding account. This fund shall be a restricted-receipt account and shall be kept by the general treasurer separately and shall be paid out by the general treasurer only upon receipt of properly authenticated vouchers signed by the administrator, or his or her designee, for the division’s share of the account. The same procedure shall be followed for the commission, except that such vouchers shall be signed by the commission chairperson, or his or her designee. The general treasurer shall provide for separate accounting of the division and commission budget and expenses. The moneys in the public-utilities fund shall be expended by the administrator or the commission, as appropriate for meeting the expenses of the operation of the commission, the division, and those expenses incurred by the attorney general, pursuant to §

39-1-19

.

The legislature may appropriate from the general funds such sums as are necessary for the regulation of public utilities.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 63; P.L. 1955, ch. 3436, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-14

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-23

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 55, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 103; P.L. 2016, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 444, § 1.

39-1-23.1.
Motor carrier enforcement program created — Recovery of expenses through a percentage of fines collected from motor carriers.

The administrator has been charged under this title with the responsibility of promoting adequate, economical, and efficient service by motor carriers and reasonable charges therefore without unjust discriminations, undue preferences, or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices. This legislative charge further requires that the administrator improve the relations between, and coordinate transportation by, and the regulations between all modes of transportation provided by the various classes of motor carriers; develop and preserve a highway transportation system properly adapted to the needs of the commerce of the state; and promote safety upon its publicly used highways in the interest of its citizens.

It is hereby declared that in order to enforce the statutes, rules, and regulations under which the administrator carries out his or her efforts to fulfill the mandates provided in subsection (a), appropriations shall be provided, pursuant to the assessment provision contained in §

39-1-23

, for the purposes of providing the administrator with the financial means to maintain an enforcement presence in the transportation industry. The appropriations shall be used by the administrator to create and maintain a field enforcement staff of at least two (2) inspector-auditors whose sole responsibilities shall be to promote and compel compliance with all applicable motor carrier related statutes, rules, and regulations. In addition to compensation for inspector-auditors, the motor carrier enforcement appropriations may be used to purchase any materials or equipment necessary for this field enforcement staff and any training or educational programs germane to its regulatory functions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 116; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 103; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 29, § 1.

39-1-24.
Certification, collection, and deposit of assessments.

On or before the first day of August in each year, the administrator shall certify to the state controller the amount of the assessment made pursuant to §

39-1-23

and the name and address of each company against whom the assessment is made. Each company shall pay the administrator the amount assessed against it within thirty (30) days from the receipt of the assessment with interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum if unpaid at the due date. The administrator shall deposit all payments with the general treasurer. The amount so deposited shall be credited to the general fund of the state and accounted for as expenses recovered from public utility companies and common carriers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 63; P.L. 1955, ch. 3436, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-15

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-24

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-25.
Objection to assessments.

Each company shall pay to the administrator the amount assessed against it or shall file with the commission its objections in writing setting out the grounds upon which it claims that the assessment is excessive, erroneous, unlawful, or invalid. The commission shall, within thirty (30) days from the receipt of the objection, hold a hearing and issue an order in accordance with its findings.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 63; P.L. 1955, ch. 3436, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-16

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-25

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-26.
Public utilities reserve fund created — Appropriations — Recovery of expenses from utility companies.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the public utilities reserve account, an account within the public utilities commission in the general fund. Such account, hereinafter referred to as the “fund,” shall be used for the purpose of providing the financial means for the commission and division to purchase materials, and to employ on a contract or other basis, legal counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants, economists, and other expert witnesses, and for other necessary expenses of the commission and division in investigations and hearings related to applications and filings made by public utilities, or commission- or division-initiated investigations into utility operating practices, or related appeals to state or federal courts or in relevant regulatory matters before federal agencies. The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the fund a sum equal to twenty-five one thousandths of one percent (.00025%) of the gross, annual operating revenues of gas, electric, and telephone companies attributable to their conduct of intrastate operations in this state during the year next preceding; provided, however, that if at June 30, in any year the balance in the fund shall be in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the amount of the excess shall forthwith be transferred to the general fund of the state. Prebilled revenue shall be excluded from an excess balance to be transferred to the general fund. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment from the fund of such sums as may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the administrator.

The public utility making an application or filing to the commission or division, or subject to a commission- or division-initiated investigation, or any public utility distributing electricity or gas whose retail rates would be affected by a proceeding before an agency of the federal government or a federal court, shall be charged with and shall pay a portion of the expenses reasonably so incurred by the commission and by the division for the purchase of materials and for the employment of legal counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants, and expert witnesses, and for travel and other necessary expenses as are reasonably attributable to the investigation or the hearing of the proposal by the commission and the division, or to the administrator’s representation of the state before federal or state courts or an agency of the federal government. The administrator or the commission chairperson, as appropriate, shall ascertain the expenses and shall determine the amount to be paid by the public utility company or companies, and bills shall be rendered therefor either at the conclusion of the investigation or hearing, or from time to time during its progress, and the amount of each bill so rendered shall be paid by the public utility to the administrator or the commission, as appropriate, within thirty (30) days from the date of its rendition unless, within the thirty-day (30) time period, the public utility so billed shall request an opportunity to be heard by the commission as to the amount thereof. The commission shall comply with any such request. Any amount of the bill not paid within thirty (30) days from the date of service of the determination upon the hearing, or, if none shall be requested, within thirty (30) days from the date of rendition of the bill, shall draw interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum. At the discretion of the administrator, or the commission chairperson, as appropriate, utility companies may be prebilled for contractual services utilized by the commission or division. Any revenue received from public utilities not expended upon the completion of the case will be promptly reimbursed to the utility company. The total amount that may be charged to any public utility under authority of this section for proceedings before the commission or division or in related appeals before state or federal courts in any calendar year shall not exceed seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), provided that any indirect cost recovery obligations pursuant to §

35-4-27

shall constitute a separate and additional assessment to public utilities to be added to the foregoing expense assessment limit; in addition, the total amount that may be charged against any public utility under authority of this section for the administrator’s representation of the state before agencies of the federal government in any calendar year shall not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). All moneys collected by the administrator or the commission pursuant to this section shall be paid by him or her monthly to the general treasurer to be added to the public utilities reserve fund.

The division of public utilities and carriers shall adopt by regulation, a fee schedule for all telecommunications filings, including initial applications and annual registrations, by telecommunications providers that are not otherwise subject to the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section. The money assessed and paid shall be paid into the general fund and shall not be a part of the public utilities reserve fund.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the salaries of the commissioners and their expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, and for the operations of the commission and the division and payment of such office expenses and assistance as from time to time may be required. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum, or so much thereof, as may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of vouchers approved by the administrator or his or her authorized agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 76, § 6; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 55, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 90, § 1.

39-1-27.
Electric distribution companies required to file restructuring plans.

Each electric distribution company shall file with the commission a plan for transferring ownership of generation facilities into a separate affiliate of the electric distribution company. The transmission facilities owned by the electric distribution company also may be transferred to an affiliated electric transmission company at a price that shall equal the book value of the transmission facilities on the electric distribution company’s accounts net of depreciation and deferred taxes as the date of transfer, but such a transfer is not required. The generation plant, equipment, and facilities owned by an electric distribution company shall be transferred to an affiliate that is a nonregulated power producer at a price that shall equal the book value of the generation plant, equipment, and facilities on the electric distribution company’s accounts net of depreciation and deferred taxes as of the date of the transfer. Consistent with the schedule for implementing retail access in §

39-1-27.3

, each electric transmission company shall file tariffs with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) and electric-distribution companies shall file tariffs with the commission. The tariffs will provide the terms, conditions, and rates for nondiscriminatory access to transmission and distribution facilities to wholesale and retail customers and to nonregulated power producers. The tariffs shall: (1) Conform to the standards, policies, and requirements of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or the commission as appropriate with respect to nondiscriminatory access to transmission and distribution services; (2) Fulfill such standards with respect to both transmission and distribution services for the benefit of both wholesale and retail customers and their suppliers; and (3) Provide retail access in accordance with the schedule set forth in §

39-1-27.3

. For purposes of this section, “nondiscriminatory access” means access to transmission and distribution services on rates, terms, and conditions found to be reasonable by the FERC or the commission as appropriate and applied consistently to all customers in a rate class regardless of their supplier. When establishing terms and conditions for distribution service, the commission shall implement standards, policies, and requirements consistent with those established by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for transmission service unless it determines that alternative terms and conditions are in the public interest.

The commission shall review the plan within six (6) months of filing and if the plan is in compliance with chapter 3 of this title, shall authorize the property transfers, securities issuances, and affiliate transactions pursuant to this title and shall grant all necessary regulatory approvals. All existing state and local rights, authorizations, and approvals, including but not limited to, permits, licenses, locations, indentures, leases, orders, or similar rights associated with the ownership and operation of plant and equipment, shall be deemed transferred with the associated plant and equipment upon the commission’s authorization of the transfer effective as of the date of transfer. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section, if the electric distribution company’s wholesale power supplier chooses to transfer its generation assets to a nonaffiliate of the electric distribution company for purposes of carrying out the market valuation required by §

39-1-27.4(g)

, and such transfer to a nonaffiliate is specified in the electric distribution company’s restructuring plan filed with the commission pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the transfer of the electric distribution company’s interest in the generation facilities may be made directly to the nonaffiliate. In the case of such a transfer directly to a nonaffiliate, all of the state and local rights, authorizations, and approvals, including those enumerated above, shall be deemed transferred with the associated plant and equipment upon the commission’s authorization of the transfer effective as of the date of the transfer.

The electric distribution company shall implement the corporate reorganizations and property transfers specified in such restructuring plan; terminate its all-requirements contract with its wholesale power supplier on the terms set forth in §

39-1-27.4

; and provide retail access for all customers in Rhode Island with a standard offer, as set forth in §

39-1-27.3

, no later than three (3) months after retail access is available to forty percent (40%) or more of the kilowatt-hour sales in New England. The commission may extend this time if it determines that additional time is necessary to implement the transactions on reasonable terms and in accordance with a reasonable schedule; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the effect of §

39-1-27.3

or permit the commission to unduly discriminate in providing retail access among or within rate classes.

Following the complete implementation of the restructuring plans, electric distribution companies shall be prohibited from selling electricity at retail and from owning, operating, or controlling generating facilities, although such facilities may be owned by affiliates of electric distribution companies. For purposes of this subsection, providing the standard-offer service and last-resort power supply in accordance with subsections (d) and (f) of §

39-1-27.3

shall not be construed as selling electricity at retail.

Following the termination of the electric distribution company’s contracts with its wholesale power supplier, the wholesale power supplier shall become a nonregulated power producer, and shall be free, subject to the requirements of the standard offer set forth in § 39-1-27.3(e) and retail electric licensing commission plan requirements pursuant to §

39-1-27.1

, to sell electricity generated from each of its facilities on either the wholesale or retail markets at market prices, either directly or through an affiliate, which shall also become a nonregulated power producer. The former wholesale power supplier and its affiliates shall be free to apply to become exempt wholesale generators pursuant to § 32 of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, 15 U.S.C. § 79z-5a [repealed], and other federal law, rules, and regulations, and each and every generating facility of the former wholesale power supplier shall become an eligible facility pursuant to that statute. Accordingly, the legislature hereby finds and declares that the division has sufficient regulatory authority, resources, access to books and records to exercise its duties; and that the full participation of former wholesale power suppliers and affiliated nonregulated power producers in the market and the designation of each of the former wholesale power supplier’s facilities as eligible facilities will benefit consumers; is consistent with state law; will not provide any unfair competitive advantage by virtue of their status as a former wholesale power supplier or as affiliates of electric distribution companies; and is in the public interest.

Although reducing air emissions from power plants is a goal of electricity industry restructuring, power plants in Rhode Island already have low emissions relative to their counterparts in other states. For this reason, it is unnecessary for the restructuring plans required by this section to address in-state air emission reductions. However, to the extent a wholesale power supplier receiving contract termination fees pursuant to §

39-1-27.4(b)(4)

owns and operates as of December 31, 1995, fossil-fired generation in another state that does not meet air emission standards applicable as of that date to new electric-generating facilities in that state, the wholesale power suppliers shall cooperate with the appropriate environmental officials in the state or states where the generating facilities are located to develop a plan for reducing the emissions of nitrogen oxides, sulfur dioxide, and particulate matter from the plants on an overall basis through retirements, replacements, controls, or offsets, or any combination of the above, toward the air emissions standards applicable to new electric-generating facilities in effect in the state or states where the plants are located as of January 1, 1996. The plans shall be implemented in connection with electric-industry restructuring in the state or states where the generating facilities are located.

An electric distribution company, whether public, quasi-municipal, or investor owned, that as of January 1, 1996, did not purchase power at wholesale from a wholesale power supplier under an all-requirements contract, shall include proposals for recovering transition costs consistent with the elements that would be comparable in nature to the elements included in termination fees pursuant to §

39-1-27.4(b)

through (g) and for providing a standard offer consistent with requirements of §

39-1-27.3(d)

in its plan filed with the commission pursuant to this section. The filing by an electric distribution company that is a quasi-municipal corporation shall also address any unique circumstances affecting the electric distribution company, including special contract requirements or charter restrictions and the conditions that the quasi-municipal corporation must satisfy in order to participate in retail competition. In reviewing the filing and determining the appropriate level of transition cost recovery, the commission shall apply standards consistent with those contained in §

39-1-27.4(b)

through (g) and with this subsection. The commission shall be authorized to take any action or to grant any approval necessary to maintain hydroelectric power purchases from the Niagara and St. Lawrence power projects by quasi-municipal corporations. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, quasi-municipal electric distribution companies that purchase hydroelectric power from the Niagara and St. Lawrence power projects shall be authorized to continue to resell that power to residential customers within their service territories. After notice and public hearing, the commission may exempt electric distribution companies subject to this subsection from: (1) The requirement to transfer ownership of generation and transmission facilities to affiliated companies pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; and (2) The prohibition against selling electricity at retail pursuant to subsection (d) of this section with respect to sales within the service territory of the electric distribution company, if it determines that the exemptions are in the public interest.

With the exception of the requirements of the standard offer set forth in § 39-1-27.3(e) and (f) and retail electric licensing commission plan requirements pursuant to §

39-1-27.1

, nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to constrain the application of antitrust laws to nonregulated power producers, whether affiliated or not with an electric distribution company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 357, § 1.

39-1-27.1.
Retail electric licensing commission plan requirements and nonregulated power producer registration requirements.

The retail electric licensing commission shall, by January 1, 1997, submit a plan to the legislature that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A recommendation for taxing and/or assessing electric distribution companies, electric transmission companies, and nonregulated power producers;

Recommendations regarding changes to the regional power pool that would facilitate the creation of an independent system operator and voluntary power exchange; and

Proposals for consumer protections, access to books and records, and other requirements the retail electric licensing commission determines to be reasonable, necessary, and in the public interest.

On or before January 1, 1997, the public utilities commission shall establish regulations applicable to nonregulated power producers that are selling electricity in this state that are necessary to meet (directly or through contract) the operating and reliability standards of the regional power pool.

In addition, the public utilities commission shall participate in all proceedings before the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission with respect to the modification and/or termination of wholesale all requirements contracts in place as of January 1, 1996, between electric-distribution companies operating in this state and their affiliated power suppliers. The purpose of this participation is to ensure that termination fees payable by ultimate customers in this state are determined in accordance with the provisions of §

39-1-27.4

. To facilitate this participation, the public utilities commission is authorized to assess electric-distribution companies under its jurisdiction for its reasonable expenses incurred in connection with its participation in those proceedings, up to a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year, which assessments shall be in addition to all other assessments authorized by this title.

On January 1, 1998, and annually for the next four (4) years thereafter, the public utilities commission shall transmit to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate, a report detailing: developments in the competitive power supply market in this state; estimated savings realized by customers as a result of the introduction of retail competition in the power supply market; progress towards implementation of a regional transmission agreement for New England and other reforms implemented by the regional power pool; and the status of electric industry restructuring activities in the other New England states and any recommendations for statutory changes.

All nonregulated power producers seeking to engage in the retail sale of electricity in this state must file with the division of public utilities and carriers a notarized registration application that includes the information identified below and any additional information required by the division of public utilities and carriers pursuant to regulations issued to protect the public interest in connection with the registration of entities seeking to sell electricity at retail:

Legal name;

Business address;

The name of the state where organized; the date of organization; a copy of the articles of incorporation, association, partnership agreement, or other similar document regarding legal organization;

Name and business address of all officers and directors, partners, or other similar officials;

Name, title, and telephone number of customer-service contact person;

Name, title, and telephone number of regulatory contact person;

Name, title, and address of registered agent for service of process;

Brief description of the nature of business being conducted; and

Evidence of financial soundness, except those nonregulated power producers that may be obligated entities under §

39-26-2(17)

shall provide security such as a surety bond or other financial instrument showing evidence of liquid funds, such as a certificate of deposit, an irrevocable letter of credit, a line of credit, a loan, or guarantees in an amount specified by the division, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the division on or before February 1, 2017, provided that the amount be not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), nor more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). The financial instrument shall name the public utilities commission and division of public utilities and carriers as obligees. Financial security shall be reviewed each year at the time a nonregulated power producer makes its annual filing. The financial security shall be available to satisfy penalties assessed by the division for violations of any consumer-protection rules or laws related to nonregulated power producers; refunds ordered by the division; or failure to comply with the provisions of chapter 26 of this title, as determined by the public utilities commission. Payments made pursuant to this subsection for violation of the provisions of §

39-26-4

shall be forfeited, and shall be remitted to the renewable energy development fund established in §

39-26-7

, or any successor funds, and all other forfeitures will be remitted to the state’s general fund.

Copies of all filings pursuant to subsection (c) shall be served upon the commission and all electric distribution companies. Updated information shall be filed within ten (10) days of any change to the information included in a registration application, as filed or previously updated. Registration applications filed pursuant to subsection (c) shall become effective thirty (30) days after filing with the division, unless rejected during the thirty-day (30) period. If the division should reject a registration application, it shall specify the applicable reasons in writing and, if practicable, identify alternative ways to overcome any deficiencies. After an opportunity of a hearing, the division may rescind a nonregulated power producer’s registration for cause. Nonregulated power producers shall be authorized to do business in this state after their registration becomes effective and while it remains in good standing.

A filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall accompany all registration applications filed pursuant to subsection (c). Nonregulated power producers shall thereafter renew their registrations with the division on an annual basis. Applications for renewal shall be filed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. Applications for renewal shall specify any changes in previously filed registration information. A filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall accompany all applications for renewal of nonregulated power producer status.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 497, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 281, § 1.

39-1-27.2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 315, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 10, effective July 3, 2006.